South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-9-780(E)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) The adoption agency shall establish and maintain a confidential register containing the names and addresses of the adoptees and the biological parents, biological grandparents, and biological siblings who have filed affidavits. It is the responsibility of a person whose name and address are in the register to provide the agency with his current name and address. The adoption agency shall release the identifying information requested pursuant to this subsection of only those adoptees, biological parents, biological grandparents, and biological siblings who have provided an affidavit pursuant to item (1) in accordance with the provisions of subsection (G). SECTION 2.  Section 63-9-780 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, an adoption agency shall furnish the identity of an adoptee's biological parent, as well as all other information maintained in case records by the adoption agency, the family court, and the Department of Public Health's bureau of vital statistics related to the adoption and issuance of an adoption decree, to the adoptee if the adoptee is at least eighteen years of age and furnishes the adoption agency with a certification from the Department of Public Health's bureau of vital statistics or from an office of vital records in another jurisdiction certifying that the biological parent is deceased. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----